Tables/Contraction/de-wort.cti
before hilmnrsu always gebäude 12346-12-34-145-15
prfword gebäuden 12346-12-34-145-14
prfword gebäudes 12346-12-34-145-123456
before hilmnrsu always gebinde 12346-12-35-145-15
prfword gebinden 12346-12-35-145-14
prfword gebindes 12346-12-35-145-123456
always geburtstag 12346-12-136-1235-2345-234-2345-1-1245 shouldn't use the st-contraction
prfword geburtstage 12346-12-136-1235-2345-234-2345-1-12346 shouldn't use the st-contraction
always demütig 145-12356-1256-2345-45 shouldn't use the dem-contraction
always gefangenen 12346-124-235-1245-14-14
sufword gehäuse 12346-125-34-234-15
prfword gehäusen 12346-125-34-234-14
prfword gehäuses 12346-125-34-234-123456
before cost always geistes 1245-146-23456-123456
always geruch 12346-1235-136-1456 shouldn't use the er-contraction
always gerüst 12346-1235-1256-23456 shouldn't use the er-contraction
always gesund 12346-234-256-145
always gewänder 12346-2456-345-1345-145-12456 shouldn't use the änder-contraction

begword gewebe 12346-2456-15-23
word geweben 12346-2456-15-12-14
word gewebes 12346-2456-15-12-123456

before hilmnrsu always gewinde 12346-2456-35-145-15
always gewindelt 12346-2456-35-145-13456-2345
always gewindelte 12346-2456-35-145-13456-236
always gewindeltem 12346-2456-35-145-13456-2345-12356
always gewindelten 12346-2456-35-145-13456-2345-14
always gewindelter 12346-2456-35-145-13456-2345-12456
always gewindeltes 12346-2456-35-145-13456-2345-123456
prfword gewinden 12346-2456-35-145-14
prfword gewindes 12346-2456-35-145-123456
word gewindeschaft 12346-2456-35-145-15-156-1-124-2345
before hilmnrsu always gemeinde 12346-134-1246-145-15 gemeinderat shouldn't use the er-contraction

before hilmnrsu always gelatine 12346-123-1-2345-35-15
prfword gelatinen 12346-123-1-2345-35-14

prfword gemeinden 12346-134-1246-145-14
prfword gemeindend 12346-134-1246-145-14-145
prfword gemeindende 12346-134-1246-145-14-145-15
prfword gemeindendem 12346-134-1246-145-14-145-12356
prfword gemeindenden 12346-134-1246-145-14-145-14
prfword gemeindender 12346-134-1246-145-14-145-12456
prfword gemeindendes 12346-134-1246-145-14-145-123456
always gemeindeutsch 12346-134-1246-145-156
always gemüse 12346-134-1256-234-15
prfword gemüsen 12346-134-1256-234-14
prfword gemüses 12346-134-1256-234-123456
always genehmig 12346-1345-125-45 should use the nehm-contraction
begmidword general 1245-14-12456-25 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
endword general 1245-14-12456-1-123 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always generäl 1245-14-12456-345-123 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
begword gerb 1245-12456-12
always gerüch 12346-1235-1256-1456
always geschoben 12346-156-135-12-14 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always getreide 12346-2345-1235-146-145-15
prfword getreiden 12346-2345-1235-146-145-14
prfword getreides 12346-2345-1235-146-145-123456
always gorgonzola 1245-26-1245-135-1345-1356-135-123-1
always gottes 1245-135-2345-2345-123456
always grippeimpf = shouldn't use the ei-contraction
before cost always glas =
always plexiglas 1234-123-15-6-1346-24-1245-123-1-234 shouldn't use the ig-contraction
always schwinglasch 156-2456-35-1245-123-1-156
prfword glast 1245-123-1-23456
before cost always abgas =
before cost always bonus =
word bonusse 12-135-1345-136-2346-15
before cost always malus 134-25-136-234
before cost always erdgas 12456-145-1245-1-234
before cost begword gleis 1245-123-146-234
before cost always kultus =
before cost always luxus =
before cost always evolutions =
before cost always status 23456-1-2345-136-234
before cost begword todes 2345-135-145-123456

always glucose =
always glukose =
before cegn always gummi 1245-136-1346-24
always gummieren 1245-136-1346-346-1235-14
prfword gummiert 1245-136-1346-346-1235-2345
prfword gummierte 1245-136-1346-346-1235-236
prfword gummiertem 1245-136-1346-346-1235-2345-12356
prfword gummierten 1245-136-1346-346-1235-2345-14
prfword gummierter 1245-136-1346-346-1235-2345-12456
prfword gummiertes 1245-136-1346-346-1235-2345-123456
always gummierung 1245-136-1346-346-1235-136
before t always gummisor 1245-136-1346-24-234-26
always gürtel 1245-1256-1235-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always guertel 1245-1256-1235-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
before t always habich 125-1-12-3456
prfword haie =
prfword hain =
prfword haine =
prfword hainen 125-1-24-1345-14
prfword haines 125-1-24-1345-123456
prfword hains =
always häresie 125-345-1235-15-234-346 shouldn't use the es-contraction
always haeresie 125-345-1235-15-234-346 shouldn't use the es-contraction
sufword hallen 125-1-12345-14 shouldn't use the allen-contraction

before cost always haus 125-16-234
prfword haust 125-16-23456
always haustein 125-16-23456-1246


always health =
before cost always heeres 125-15-15-1235-123456
begword heimat 125-146-134-1-2345 shouldn't allow te-contraction and possibly overlaps with materi(e)
always ehebel 15-125-15-12-13456
always eherstell 15-125-12456-2-13456
always hetero 125-15-2345-12456-135 shoudln't use the te-contraction
always hierarch 125-346-1235-356-1456 shouldn't use the hier- nor er-contraction
before hilmnrsu always hilfe =
prfword hilfen 125-24-123-124-14
always gehilfen 12346-125-24-123-124-14


before t always hilfs =
prfword hilfst 125-24-123-124-23456
sufword hirse =
sufword holunder 125-135-123-256-145-12456
always hungrig 125-256-1245-1235-45 shouldn't use the ung-contraction
always hypnose =
prfword hypnosen 125-6-13456-1234-1345-135-234-14
always infanterie 35-124-235-2345-12456-346
prfword infanterien 35-124-235-2345-12456-24-14
prfword imitat =
always indoor 35-145-135-135-1235 shouldn't use the or-contraction
before t always infraro 35-124-1235-1-1235-135
always insolvenz 35-234-135-123-1236-14-1356 shouldn't use the so-contraction
always johannis 245-135-125-235-1345-24-234
always jubiläum = shouldn't use the äu-contraction
always jubilaeum = shouldn't use the äu-contraction
always kabel 13-1-12-13456
before lnr always kamera 13-1-134-12456-1
before konsonant always kameral 13-1-134-12456-25
always kameralia 13-1-134-12456-25-24-1
always kameralismus 13-1-134-12456-25-5-24
always kameralist 13-1-134-12456-25-24-23456
always kameralistisch 13-1-134-12456-25-5-156
always karies 13-356-24-123456
before hilmnrsu always karriere 13-356-1235-24-12456-15
prfword karrieren 13-356-1235-24-12456-14
prfword kastanie 13-1-23456-235-24-15
always kaufpreis 13-16-124-1234-1235-146-234
always kavallerie 13-1-1236-1-12345-12456-346 shouldn't use the aller-contraction
prfword kavallerien 13-1-1236-1-12345-12456-24-14 shouldn't use the aller-contraction
always kavallerist 13-1-1236-1-12345-12456-24-23456 shouldn't use the aller-contraction
always board =
always mainboard =
always kitaleit 13-24-2345-1-123-146-2345 shouldn't use the al-contraction
always klageruf 13-123-1-12346-123-136-124
sufword klang 13-123-235-1245 shouldn't use the lang-contraction
sufword klebe 13-123-15-23 shouldn't use the leb-contraction
endword klebe = shouldn't use the leb-contraction
endword kleber 13-123-15-12-12456 shouldn't use the leb-contraction
endword klebern 13-123-15-12-12456-1345 shouldn't use the leb-contraction
endword klebers 13-123-15-12-12456-234 shouldn't use the leb-contraction
prfword kleben 13-123-15-12-14
prfword klebens 13-123-15-12-14-234
always klebend 13-123-15-12-14-145
before e always komödi = shouldn't use the ie-contraction
prfword komödien 13-135-134-246-145-24-14

always alexander 25-15-6-1346-235-145-12456
always anderecht 235-145-15-1235-2345
always anderegier 235-145-15-1235-1245
always anderehabilit 235-145-15-1235-12
always andericht 235-145-15-2-3456
always anderück 235-145-15-1235-46
always brander 12-1235-235-145-12456
always commander 6-14-135-1346-235-145-12456
sufword expander 1346-1234-235-145-12456
midendword expander 15-6-1346-1234-235-145-12456
always flandern 124-123-235-145-12456-1345
always koriander 13-26-24-235-145-12456
always leander 123-15-235-145-12456
prfword neandertal 1345-15-235-145-12456-2345-1-123
begmidword neandertal 1345-15-235-145-12456-2345-25
always oleander 135-123-15-235-145-12456
always palisander 1234-25-24-234-235-145-12456
always salamander 234-25-1-134-235-145-12456

always kriteri 13-1235-24-2345-12456-24 shouldn't use the te-contraction
prfword kurie =
prfword kurzeit 13-136-1235-1356-146-2345
prfword kurzeiten 13-136-1235-1356-146-2345-14
always kurzentren 13-136-1235-1356-14-2345-1235-14
always kurzentrum 13-136-1235-1356-14-2345-1235-136-134
prfword kurzelle 13-136-1235-1356-15-12345-15
prfword kurzellen 13-136-1235-1356-15-12345-14
always kurzhaar 13-1356-125-1-1-1235
before cost begword landes 123-235-145-123456
always landeschwierig 123-235-145-15-156-45
always landschafts 123-235-145-156-234
sufword lauf 123-16-124 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
always auslauf 16-234-123-16-124
always laufbahn 123-16-124-12-1-125-1345
always laufband 123-16-124-12-235-145
always laufbänd 123-16-124-12-345-1345-145
always laufgitter 123-16-124-1245-24-2345-2345-12456
always laufrad 123-16-124-1235-1-145
always laufräd 123-16-124-1235-345-145
always laufstall 123-16-124-23456-1-12345
always laufwerk 123-16-124-2456-12456-13
always laufzeit 123-16-124-1356-2345
always laufzettel 123-16-124-1356-15-2345-2345-13456
always knauf 13-1345-16-124
always kreislauf 13-1235-146-234-123-16-124
always leiter 123-146-2345-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
begmidword liberal 123-24-12-12456-25 shouldn't use the be-contraction
endword liberal 123-24-12-12456-1-123 shouldn't use the be-contraction
begmidword illiberal 24-123-123-24-12-12456-25 shouldn't use the be-contraction
endword illiberal 24-123-123-24-12-12456-1-123 shouldn't use the be-contraction
sufword liebes 123-346-12-123456
before cost always lieblings 123-346-12-123-35-1245-234
always limit =
always lipizzaner 123-24-1234-24-1356-1356-235-12456

always mantel 134-235-2345-13456

before hilmnrsu always marine 134-356-35-15
prfword marinem 134-356-35-12356
prfword marinen 134-356-35-14
prfword mariner 134-356-35-12456
prfword marines 134-356-35-123456
# people from san-marino
prfword marinese 134-356-35-123456-15
prfword marinesin 134-356-35-123456-35
prfword marinesinnen 134-356-35-123456-35-1345-14
prfword marinesisch 134-356-35-123456-24-156
prfword marinesische 134-356-35-123456-24-156-15
prfword marinesischem 134-356-35-123456-24-156-12356
prfword marinesischen 134-356-35-123456-24-156-14
prfword marinesischer 134-356-35-123456-24-156-12456
prfword marinesisches 134-356-35-123456-24-156-123456

always mmaßnahm 134-134-1-6-2346-1345-134

always matura =
always maturant 134-1-2345-136-1235-235-2345

before i always emechan 15-134-15-1456-235
before i always mmechan 134-134-15-1456-235
